Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
190D

OCEAN AND
SUBMERGED LANDS LEASING

Part I. Short Title; Purpose; Definitions

Section

190D-1 Short title

190D-2 Findings and purpose

190D-3 Definitions

Part II. Conservation Districts

190D-11 Conservation district use application

Part III. Ocean Leasing Generally;
Procedures;

Provisions

190D-21 Leasing of state marine waters and
submerged lands for

private uses

190D-22 Leasing procedure

190D-23 Lease provisions

190D-24 Konohiki fishing rights

Part IV. Administration and Enforcement

190D-31 Enforcement

190D-32 Rules

190D-33 Revenues

190D-34 Penalties

190D-35 Civil liability

190D-36 Criminal liability

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Law Journals and Reviews

State-Federal Conflict Over Naval Defensive Sea Areas in
Hawai‘i. 14 UH L. Rev. 595.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next